pl: Konfiguracja przycisku basowego: 12 basów; 120 basów; 24 basów; 32 basów; 48 basów; 60 basów; 72 basów; 8 basów; 80 basów; 96 basów; Ponad 120; Inne
hr-HR: Konfiguracija tipki za bas: 12 basova; 120 basova; 24 basova; 32 basa; 48 basova; 60 basova; 72 basa; 8 basova; 80 basova; 96 basova; Više od 120; Ostalo
vi: Cấu hình nút bass: 12 bass; 120 bass; 24 bass; 32 bass; 48 bass; 60 bass; 72 bass; 8 bass; 80 bass; 96 bass; Hơn 120; Khác
fr: Configuration des boutons de basse: 12 basse; 120 basses; 24 basses; 32 basses; 48 basses; 60 basses; 72 basses; 8 basses; 80 basses; 96 basses; Moins de 120 fois; Autre
sk-SK: Konfigurácia basových tlačidiel: 12 basov; 120 basov; 24 basov; 32 basov; 48 basov; 60 basov; 72 basov; 8 basov; 80 basov; 96 basov; Viac ako 120; Iné
it: Configurazione dei pulsanti dei bassi: Basso a 12; Basso a 120; Basso a 24; Basso a 32; Basso a 48; Basso a 60; Basso a 72; Basso a 8; Basso a 80; Basso a 96; Più di 120; Altro
cs: Konfigurace basového tlačítka: 12 basů; 120 basů; 24 basů; 32 basů; 48 basů; 60 basů; 72 basů; 8 basů; 80 basů; 96 basů; Více než 120; Jiné
tr: Bas düğmesi yapılandırması: 12 bas; 120 bas; 24 bas; 32 bas; 48 bas; 60 bas; 72 bas; 8 bas; 80 bas; 96 bas; 120'den fazla; Diğer
hu: Basszusgomb konfigurációja: 12 basszusgomb; 120 basszusgomb; 24 basszusgomb; 32 basszusgomb; 48 basszusgomb; 60 basszusgomb; 72 basszusgomb; 8 basszusgomb; 80 basszusgomb; 96 basszusgomb; Több mint 120; Egyéb
es: Configuración del botón del bajo: 12 bajos; 120 bajos; 24 bajos; 32 bajos; 48 bajos; 60 bajos; 72 bajos; 8 bajo; 80 bajo; 96 bajos; Más de 120; Otros
bg-BG: Конфигурация на бас копче: 12 баса; 120 баса; 24 баса; 32 баса; 48 баса; 60 баса; 72 баса; 8 баса; 80 баса; 96 баса; Повече от 120; Други
de: Konfiguration der Basstaste: 12-Bass; 120-Bass; 24-Bass; 32-Bass; 48-Bass; 60-Bass; 72-Bass; 8-Bass; 80-Bass; 96-Bass; Mehr als 120; Sonstiges
ko: 베이스 버튼 구성: 12 베이스; 120 베이스; 24 베이스; 32 베이스; 48 베이스; 60 베이스; 72 베이스; 8 베이스; 80 베이스; 96 베이스; 120개 이상; 기타
ja: ベースボタンの構成: 12ベース; 120ベース; 24ベース; 32ベース; 48ベース; 60ベース; 72ベース; 8ベース; 80ベース; 96ベース; 120以上; その他
zh-CN: 低音按键配置: 12 贝斯; 120 贝斯; 24 贝斯; 32 贝斯; 48 贝斯; 60 贝斯; 72 贝斯; 8 低音; 80 低音; 96 贝斯; 超过 120; 其他
sl-SI: Konfiguracija gumbov za base: 12 basov; 120 basov; 24 basov; 32 basov; 48 basov; 60 basov; 72 basov; 8 basov; 80 basov; 96 basov; Več kot 120; Drugo
lt-LT: Žemųjų dažnių mygtukų konfigūracija: 12 žemų tonų; 120 žemų tonų; 24 žemi tonai; 32 žemi tonai; 48 žemi tonai; 60 žemų tonų; 72 žemi tonai; 8 žemi tonai; 80 žemų tonų; 96 žemi tonai; Daugiau nei 120; Kita
en: Bass button configuration: 12 bass; 120 bass; 24 bass; 32 bass; 48 bass; 60 bass; 72 bass; 8 bass; 80 bass; 96 bass; More than 120; Other
nl: Configuratie basknop: 12 bas; 120 bas; 24 bas; 32 bas; 48 bas; 60 bas; 72 bas; 8 bass; 80 bass; 96 bas; Meer dan 120; Andere
pt-PT: Configuração de botão de baixo: 12 graves; 120 graves; 24 graves; 32 graves; 48 graves; 60 graves; 72 graves; 8 baixos; 80 baixos; 96 graves; Mais de 120; Outro
fi: Bassopainikkeen konfiguraatio: 12 bassoa; 120 bassoa; 24 bassoa; 32 bassoa; 48 bassoa; 60 bassoa; 72 bassoa; 8 bassoa; 80 bassoa; 96 bassoa; Yli 120; Muu
th: รูปร่างภายนอกของปุ่มเบส: 12 เบส; 120 เบส; 24 เบส; 32 เบส; 48 เบส; 60 เบส; 72 เบส; 8 เบส; 80 เบส; 96 เบส; มากกว่า 120; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Configuração do botão do baixo: 12 graves; 120 graves; 24 graves; 32 graves; 48 graves; 60 graves; 72 graves; 8 graves; 80 graves; 96 graves; Mais de 120; Outro
da: Konfiguration af basknap: 12 bas; 120 bas; 24 bas; 32 bas; 48 bas; 60 bas; 72 bas; 8 bas; 80 bas; 96 bas; Mere end 120; Andet
nb: Konfigurasjon av bassknapp: 12 bass; 120 bass; 24 bass; 32 bass; 48 bass; 60 bass; 72 bass; 8 bass; 80 bass; 96 bass; Mer enn 120; Annet
zh-TW: 低音按鈕配置: 12 低音按鈕; 120 低音按鈕; 24 低音按鈕; 32 低音按鈕; 48 低音按鈕; 60 低音按鈕; 72 低音按鈕; 8 低音按鈕; 80 低音按鈕; 96 低音按鈕; 超過 120 個; 其他
sv: Uppsättning av basknappar: 12 bas; 120 bas; 24 bas; 32 bas; 48 bas; 60 bas; 72 bas; 8 basknappar; 80 basknappar; 96 bas; Mer än 120; Övrigt
ro-RO: Configurare buton bas: 12 bași; 120 bași; 24 bași; 32 bași; 48 bași; 60 bași; 72 bași; 8 bași; 80 bași; 96 bași; Peste 120 bași; Altele
el: Διαμόρφωση κουμπιού μπάσου: 12 μπάσα; 120 μπάσα; 24 μπάσα; 32 μπάσα; 48 μπάσα; 60 μπάσα; 72 μπάσα; 8 μπάσα; 80 μπάσα; 96 μπάσα; Περισσότερα από 120; Άλλο
ru: Басовые кнопки: 12 кнопок; 120 кнопок; 24 кнопки; 32 кнопки; 48 кнопок; 60 кнопок; 72 кнопки; 8 кнопок; 80 кнопок; 96 кнопок; Больше 120; Другое